Alaska statutes. Title 43. Revenue and Taxation.
Article 2. Fisheries Products Sold Outside Taxing Jurisdiction.

Collateral references. —

35A Am. Jur. 2d, Fish, Game, and Wildlife Conservation, § 49

71 Am. Jur. 2d, State and Local Taxation, §§ 170-173, 216-221.

36A C.J.S., Fish, § 28.

State tax on or in respect of goods shipped in interstate commerce to consignee for sale on consignor’s account without previous sale or order for purchase. 4 ALR2d 244.

Loading or unloading interstate freight in performance of obligation resting upon one other than interstate carrier as interstate commerce as regards local taxation. 10 ALR2d 651.

Property destined for, or in course of, removal from state as subject to taxation therein.
11 ALR2d 938.

Sec. 43.75.100.
Tax imposed on taking of fishery resource.

A person taking, purchasing, or otherwise acquiring a fishery resource that has not been subject to the tax imposed in AS

43.75.015

is subject to the tax levied in AS

43.75.015

on the value of the fishery resource if the person

transports the fishery resource to a point outside the taxing jurisdiction of the state for subsequent processing or sale outside the taxing jurisdiction of the state;

sells the fishery resource outside the taxing jurisdiction of the state; or

has the fishery resource processed by a fisheries business in the state.

The rate of tax that shall be paid by a person whose liability for the tax is established by this section is the rate of tax that would have been due under AS

43.75.015

if the fisheries business that first actually and physically processed the fish had been liable to pay the tax.

History.

(§ 1 ch 190 SLA 1959; am § 4 ch 79 SLA 1979; am §§ 8, 9 ch 117 SLA 1981; am § 4 ch 150 SLA 1990)

Administrative Code. —

For tax imposed on acquisition of fisheries resources, see 15 AAC 75, art. 2.

Sec. 43.75.110.
Return; payment of tax.

A person subject to taxes under AS

43.75.100

shall make a return stating the value of fisheries resources taken, purchased, or otherwise acquired during the license year for sale to fisheries businesses outside of the taxing jurisdiction of the state computed as required by AS

43.75.100

, and other information to carry out the provisions of AS 43.75.100 as may be prescribed by the department. The return must contain the license number and must be signed by the taxpayer or an authorized agent, under penalty of unsworn falsification in the second degree. If a receiver, trustee, or assign is operating the property or business, that person shall make the return for the person. A tax due on the basis of such return shall be collected in the same manner as if collected from the person of whose business the receiver, trustee, or assign has custody and control. The requirements for time and place of payment of tax, and the obligation to keep records and make the records available to the commissioner are the same as those prescribed in AS

43.75.011

—

43.75.050

.

History.

(§ 2 ch 190 SLA 1959; am § 9 ch 79 SLA 1979; am § 55 ch 21 SLA 1991; am § 28 ch 42 SLA 2006)

Sec. 43.75.120.
Violations and penalties. [Repealed, § 46 ch 113 SLA 1980. For current law, see AS 43.05.220 and 43.05.290.]